Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1023.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of January 17, 1968 (P.L.11, No.5), known as The Minimum Wage Act of 1968, is amended by adding sections to read:Section 3.1. Employment in Executive Capacity. -- (a) For purposes of this act, "employment in a bona fide executive capacity" means work by an individual:(1) Whose primary duty is the management of the enterprise in which the individuals are employed or of a customarily recognized department or subdivision.123456789101112131415161718192021 The term "management" includes activities such as interviewing, selecting and training of employees; setting and adjusting employees' rates of pay and hours of work of employees; directing the work of employees; maintaining production or sales records for use in supervision or control; appraising employees' productivity and efficiency for the purpose of recommending promotions or other changes in status; handling employee complaints and grievances; disciplining employees; planning the work of employees; determining the techniques to be used to perform work; apportioning the work among employees; determining the type of materials, supplies, machinery, equipment or tools to be used or merchandise to be bought, stocked and sold; controlling the flow and distribution of materials or merchandise and supplies; providing for the safety and security of employees or the property; planning and controlling the budget; and monitoring or implementing legal compliance measures.(2) Who customarily and regularly directs the work of two or more other employees.(3) Who has the authority to hire or fire other employees or whose suggestions and recommendations as to the hiring, firing, advancement, promotion or any other change of status of other employees are given particular weight.(4) Who is compensated for services on a salary basis at a rate of not less than:(i) Eight hundred forty-four dollars ($844) per week exclusive of board, lodging or other facilities, effective October 3, 2027.(ii) Nine hundred eighty-six dollars ($986) per week exclusive of board, lodging or other facilities, effective 20250HB1023PN1103 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 October 3, 2028.(iii) One thousand one hundred twenty-eight dollars ($1,128) per week exclusive of board, lodging or other facilities, effective October 3, 2029.(iv) Effective October 3, 2030, and each third year thereafter, the weighted average 10th percentile wages for Pennsylvania workers who work in exempt executive, administrative or professional classifications as determined by the department with advice and consultation by the board and based on an annual wage survey of all worker classifications conducted by the department. The following procedure shall apply under this paragraph:(A) At least 90 days prior to the effective date of each three-year period in this subparagraph, the department shall submit to the board the adjusted weekly salary rate under this subparagraph and the information supporting the adjusted salary rate.(B) Upon review of the information submitted by the department and at a meeting to be held no later than 60 days before the effective date of the adjusted weekly salary rate, the board may provide advice and consultation to the secretary regarding the adjusted weekly salary rate.(C) At least 30 days prior to the effective date of each three-year period in this subparagraph, the department shall publish the adjusted weekly salary rate on the department's publicly accessible Internet website and shall transmit notice of the annual wage survey report to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.(b) Up to 10% of the salary amount required under subsection 20250HB1023PN1103 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a)(4) may be satisfied by the payment of nondiscretionary bonuses, incentives and commissions annually or more frequently. The employer may use any 52-week period as the year, such as a calendar year, fiscal year or anniversary of hire year. If the employer does not identify some other year period in advance, the calendar year shall apply. If by the last pay period of the year the sum of the employee's weekly salary plus nondiscretionary bonus, incentive and commission payments received does not equal 52 times the weekly salary amount required under this section, the employer may make one final payment sufficient to achieve the required level no later than the next pay period after the end of the year. A final payment made after the end of the year may count only toward the prior year's salary amount and not toward the salary amount in the year it was paid.Section 3.2. Employment in Administrative Capacity.-- (a) For purposes of this act, "employment in a bona fide administrative capacity" means work by an individual:(1) Whose primary duty is the performance of office or nonmanual work directly related to management or general business operations of the employer or the customers of the employer.The term "directly related to management or general business operations" includes work in functional areas such as tax; finance; accounting; budgeting; auditing; insurance; quality control; purchasing; procurement; advertising; marketing; research; safety and health; personnel management; human resources; employee benefits; labor relations; public relations, government relations; computer network, internet and database administration; and legal and regulatory compliance.20250HB1023PN1103 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) Whose primary duty includes the exercise of discretion and independent judgment with respect to matters of significance.(3) Who is compensated for services on a salary basis at a rate of not less than:(i) Eight hundred forty-four dollars ($844) per week exclusive of board, lodging or other facilities, effective October 3, 2027.(ii) Nine hundred eighty-six dollars ($986) per week exclusive of board, lodging or other facilities, effective October 3, 2028.(iii) One thousand one hundred twenty-eight dollars ($1,128) per week exclusive of board, lodging or other facilities, effective October 3, 2029.(iv) Effective October 3, 2030, and each third year thereafter, the weighted average 10th percentile wages for Pennsylvania workers who work in exempt executive, administrative or professional classifications as determined by the department with advice and consultation by the board and based on an annual wage survey of all worker classifications conducted by the department. The following procedure shall apply under this paragraph:(A) At least 90 days prior to the effective date of each 3- year period in this subparagraph, the department shall submit to the board the adjusted weekly salary rate under this subparagraph and the information supporting the adjusted salary rate.(B) Upon review of the information submitted by the department and a meeting to be held no later than 60 days before the effective date, the board may provide advice and 20250HB1023PN1103 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 consultation to the secretary regarding the weekly salary rate.(C) At least 30 days prior to the effective date of each three-year period, the department shall publish this figure on the department's publicly accessible Internet website and transmit notice of the figure to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.(b) Up to 10% of the salary amount required under subsection (a)(3) may be satisfied by the payment of nondiscretionary bonuses, incentives and commissions that are paid yearly or more frequently. The employer may use any 52-week period as the year, such as a calendar year, fiscal year or anniversary of hire year. If the employer does not identify some other year period in advance, the calendar year shall apply. If by the last pay period of the year the sum of the employee's weekly salary plus nondiscretionary bonus, incentive and commission payments received does not equal 52 times the weekly salary amount required by this section, the employer may make one final payment sufficient to achieve the required level no later than the next pay period after the end of the year. A final payment made after the end of the year may count only toward the prior year's salary amount and not toward the salary amount in the year it was paid.Section 3.3. Employment in Professional Capacity.--(a) For purposes of this act, "employment in a bona fide professional capacity" means work by an individual:(1) Whose primary duty is the performance of work requiring either of the following:(i) knowledge of an advanced type in a field of science or learning customarily acquired by a prolonged course of 20250HB1023PN1103 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 specialized instruction and study; or(ii) invention, imagination, originality or talent in a recognized field of artistic or creative endeavor.(2) Who is compensated for services on a salary or fee basis at a rate of not less than:(i) Eight hundred forty-four dollars ($844) per week exclusive of board, lodging or other facilities, effective October 3, 2027.(ii) Nine hundred eighty-six dollars ($986) per week exclusive of board, lodging or other facilities, effective October 3, 2028.(iii) One thousand one hundred twenty-eight dollars ($1,128) per week exclusive of board, lodging or other facilities, effective October 3, 2029.(iv) Effective October 3, 2030, and each third year thereafter, the weighted average 10th percentile wages for Pennsylvania workers who work in exempt executive, administrative or professional classifications as determined by the department with advice and consultation by the board and based on an annual wage survey of all worker classifications conducted by the department. The following shall apply under this paragraph:(A) At least 90 days prior to the effective date of each three-year period in this subparagraph, the Department shall submit to the board the adjusted weekly salary rate under subparagraph (iv) and the information supporting the adjusted salary rate.(B) Upon review of the information submitted by the department and a meeting to be held no later than 60 days before the effective date, the board may provide advice and 20250HB1023PN1103 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 consultation to the secretary regarding the weekly salary rate.(C) At least 30 days prior to the effective date of each three-year period, the department shall publish this figure on the department's publicly accessible Internet website and shall transmit notice of the figure to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.(b) Up to 10% of the salary or fee amount required under subsection (a)(2) may be satisfied by the payment of nondiscretionary bonuses, incentives and commissions that are paid yearly or more frequently. The employer may use any 52-week period as the year, such as a calendar year, fiscal year or anniversary of hire year. If the employer does not identify some other year period in advance, the calendar year shall apply. If by the last pay period of the year the sum of the employee's weekly salary plus nondiscretionary bonus, incentive and commission payments received does not equal 52 times the weekly salary amount required by this section, the employer may make one final payment sufficient to achieve the required level no later than the next pay period after the end of the year. A final payment made after the end of the year may count only toward the prior year's salary amount and not toward the salary amount in the year it was paid.Section 2. All regulations and parts of regulations are abrogated to the extent of any inconsistency with the provisions of this act.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1023PN1103 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627